Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-312
Stock; enforcement of withdrawals by directors.

If the association has funds applicable for withdrawals and more than needed to retire the shares of members who have given written notice of an intention to withdraw, the directors may, if in their discretion it shall be for the best interests of the association, retire any unpledged shares by enforcing withdrawals of the same, subject to the approval and consent of the Department of Banking and Finance, and the owner or owners shall be paid the full credit value of such shares, which shall be the total of payments and dividends credited thereon less prior withdrawals, if any.

Laws 1899, c. 17, § 3, p. 86;

R.S.1913, § 488;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XIX, § 4, p. 725;

C.S.1922, § 8086;

C.S.1929, § 8-304;

Laws 1941, c. 12, § 1, p. 85;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-304;

R.S.1943, § 8-312.